Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3210
Injunction or similar relief.

A court may enjoin, or grant similar relief that would have the effect of enjoining, a financial institution from paying a depositor or beneficiary only if payment would constitute a material fraud or facilitate a material fraud with respect to a special deposit.

Laws 2025, LB231, § 10.